California, session 20252026, AB2340.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 180350) is added to Division 19 of the Public Utilities Code, to read: CHAPTER 8. Fresno Council of Governments180350. (a) If a citizens’ initiative measure that imposes a retail transactions and use tax in the County of Fresno, the proceeds of which are to be appropriated under the citizens’ initiative measure to the Fresno Council of Governments for allocation for transportation purposes, is adopted by the electors of the County of Fresno and becomes effective, the Fresno Council of Governments shall be designated a local transportation authority for purposes of the citizens’ initiative measure.(b) Pursuant to its designation as a local transportation authority under subdivision (a), the Fresno Council of Governments shall be authorized to receive and allocate the proceeds of the retail transactions and use tax and to otherwise serve as the administering agency for purposes of the citizens’ initiative measure described in subdivision (a).SEC. 2. The Legislature finds and declares that a special statute is necessary and that a general statute cannot be made applicable within the meaning of Section 16 of Article IV of the California Constitution because of the unique transportation funding crisis being faced by the County of Fresno as a result of the impending expiration of a previously authorized transactions and use tax and the termination of the administering authority of that transportation funding.SECTION 1.It is the intent of the Legislature to enact future legislation relating to the Warren-Alquist State Energy Resources Conservation and Development Act.